src/morphology/stems/prefixes.lexc
!! Prefixes
!! --------
!! Prefixes in UNDEFINED language are bound to beginning of other words.

LEXICON Prefixes
 Nouns  ;
 Verbs ;

LEXICON Nouns
!! @LEXNAME@ redirects to AN-IN, BODY, INALIENABLE
! and EXPER

AN-IN       ; ! Animate and inanimate nouns
BODY        ; ! Inanimate, generic form with m-
INALIENABLE ;
!EXPER ;

LEXICON AN-IN
!! @LEXNAME@ adds the prefixes ni-, ki-, o-. Redirects to STEMS

           @U.noun.abs@            STEMS ; 
< 0:n 0:i "@U.noun.1sg@"  0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! 1
< 0:k 0:i "@U.noun.2sg@"  0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! 2
< 0:o     "@U.noun.3sg@"  0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! 3
< 0:o     "@U.noun.3isg@" 0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! 3-singular-obviative
< 0:n 0:i "@U.noun.1pl@"  0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! exclusive Pl
< 0:k 0:i "@U.noun.12pl@" 0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! inclusive Pl
< 0:k 0:i "@U.noun.2pl@"  0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! 2pl 
< 0:o     "@U.noun.3pl@"  0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! 3pl
< 0:o     "@U.noun.3ipl@" 0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! 3-plural-obviate

!LEXICON EXPER
!< 0:i "@U.noun.exp@"  > BODY ; ! 1


LEXICON BODY
!! @LEXNAME@  adds the prefixes n-, k-, o-, and generic form m- . Redirects to BODYSTEMS.
< 0:m "@U.noun.abs@"  > BODYSTEMS ; !
< 0:n "@U.noun.1sg@"  > BODYSTEMS ; !
< 0:k "@U.noun.2sg@"  > BODYSTEMS ; !
< 0:o "@U.noun.3sg@"  > BODYSTEMS ; !
< 0:o "@U.noun.3isg@" > BODYSTEMS ; !
< 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  > BODYSTEMS ; !
< 0:k "@U.noun.12pl@" > BODYSTEMS ; !
< 0:k "@U.noun.2pl@"  > BODYSTEMS ; !
< 0:o "@U.noun.3pl@"  > BODYSTEMS ; !
< 0:o "@U.noun.3ipl@" > BODYSTEMS ; !



LEXICON INALIENABLE
!! @LEXNAME@  adds the prefixes n-, k-, o-. Redirects to INALIENABLESTEMS
       @U.noun.abs@     INALIENABLESTEMS ; 
< 0:n "@U.noun.1sg@"  > INALIENABLESTEMS ; ! 1
< 0:k "@U.noun.2sg@"  > INALIENABLESTEMS ; ! 2
< 0:o "@U.noun.3sg@"  > INALIENABLESTEMS ; ! 3
< 0:o "@U.noun.3isg@" > INALIENABLESTEMS ; ! 3indef
< 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  > INALIENABLESTEMS ; ! exclusive Pl
< 0:k "@U.noun.12pl@" > INALIENABLESTEMS ; ! inclusive Pl
< 0:k "@U.noun.2pl@"  > INALIENABLESTEMS ; ! 2pl 
< 0:o "@U.noun.3pl@"  > INALIENABLESTEMS ; ! 3pl note: is prefix o- correct?
< 0:o "@U.noun.3ipl@" > INALIENABLESTEMS ; ! 


LEXICON Verbs !!= @CODE@ divides the lexicon into four modes: independent, conjunctive, imperative and future conditional

!IA ; ! we try with both verb in one lexicon
!II ; ! intransitive inanimate
!TA ; ! transitive animate
!TI ; ! transitive inanimate


!LEXICON IA    
@U.mood.indep@ INDEPENDENT ;		  !!= * @CODE@
@U.mood.cnj@ CONJUNCTIV ;		  !!= * @CODE@ 
 IMPERATIV ;		      !!= * @CODE@
 FUTURE_CONDITIONAL ;  !!= * @CODE@


LEXICON INDEPENDENT !!= @CODE@ gives flags and prefixes for personprefix
< 0:n 0:i "@U.perspref.NI@"  0:"t2" > IND_TENSE ; !
< 0:k 0:i "@U.perspref.KI@"  0:"t2" > IND_TENSE ; !
<         "@U.perspref.NULL@"       > IND_TENSE ; !


LEXICON IND_TENSE !!= @CODE@ gives flags and prefixes for tense 
<                   "@U.tense.Prs@"     > VERBLIST ; !
< 0:k 0:î 0:%^EGLOT "@U.tense.Prt@"     > VERBLIST ; ! removed hyph
< 0:k 0:î 0:%-      "@U.tense.Prt@"     > VERBLIST ; !
< 0:k 0:a 0:%^EGLOT "@U.tense.FutDef@"  > VERBLIST ; !
< 0:k 0:a 0:%-      "@U.tense.FutDef@"  > VERBLIST ; !
< 0:w 0:î 0:%^EGLOT "@U.tense.FutInt@"  > VERBLIST ; !
< 0:w 0:î 0:%-      "@U.tense.FutInt@"  > VERBLIST ; !


LEXICON FUTURE_CONDITIONAL !!= @CODE@ gives flags for future conditional (no prefix)
@U.mood.FutCon@ VERBLIST ;

LEXICON CONJUNCTIV !!= @CODE@ gives flag for conjunctive and prefix ê-
<  0:ê 0:%-       > CNJ_TENSE ; !
<  0:ê 0:%^EGLOT   > CNJ_TENSE ; !


LEXICON CNJ_TENSE   !!= @CODE@ gives prefixes and flags for tense in conjunctive
<        			"@U.tense.Prs@"    > VERBLIST ; !Present
< 0:k 0:î 0:%-  	"@U.tense.Prt@"    > VERBLIST ;  ! Preterite, 
< 0:k 0:î 0:%^EGLOT "@U.tense.Prt@"    > VERBLIST ;  ! Preterite,
< 0:w 0:î 0:%-  	"@U.tense.FutInt@" > VERBLIST ; ! Future Intentional
< 0:w 0:î 0:%^EGLOT "@U.tense.FutInt@" > VERBLIST ; ! Future Intentional


LEXICON IMPERATIV   !!= @CODE@ gives flag for imperative (no prefixes)
@U.mood.imp@  VERBLIST ;
